Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-372.02
Decree; assignment of real estate; affidavit and certificate; filing.

(1) When a decree of dissolution of marriage assigns real estate to either party, the party to whom the real estate is assigned may (a) prepare and file with the clerk of the district court an affidavit identifying the real estate by legal description and affirmatively identifying the person entitled to the real estate and (b) prepare for signature and seal by the clerk one or more certificates in a form substantially similar to the following:
CERTIFICATE OF DISSOLUTION OF MARRIAGE............................., Clerk of the District Court of ......... County, Nebraska, certifies that in Case No. ......, in such Court, entitled ........................... vs. ........................, the Court entered its decree of dissolution of marriage in which the interest of ........................ in the following described real estate in ............... County, Nebraska:................................................................................................................................................................................................has been assigned to .................. .Dated: ....................(SEAL) Clerk of the District Court........... County, Nebraska.

(2) A certificate may include more than one parcel of real estate, but there shall be separate certificates for each party to whom real estate is assigned and separate certificates for each county in which real estate is located. The certificate or certificates shall be delivered by the clerk to the person applying for the same, and such person shall be responsible for recording the certificate or certificates with the register of deeds in the appropriate county or counties as provided in section 76-248.01.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 23;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 77.